California statutes. Public Resources Code
 update to the scoping plan prepared pursuant to Section 38561 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The assessment shall be separate from the report submitted pursuant to Section 25302 and shall be developed in a public process. The assessment shall be available to the public within the proceeding docket and shall be approved by a vote of the commission at its business meeting.

(c) The commission may enter into contracts to perform the assessment required by subdivision (a) and the contracts shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and do not need to comply with requirements under the State Contracting Manual or the Public Contract Code.

(d) The Division of Petroleum Market Oversight shall provide input to and otherwise support other
 divisions of the commission in preparation of the assessment required by subdivision (a).

(e) The Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 25373 shall provide input to the commission in preparation of the assessment required by subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 118, Sec. 7.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.1.

(a) The commission shall use reasonable means necessary and available, including, but not limited to, the authority under subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 11181 of the Government Code, to seek and obtain any facts, figures, and other information from any source for the purpose of preparing the assessment under Section 25371. The commission shall specifically report in the assessment any ongoing or unsuccessful attempts to obtain information from potential sources, including the lack of cooperation or refusal to provide information.

(b) For purposes of the assessment prepared under Section 25371, the commission may impose a civil penalty whenever a person fails to timely provide the information specified in that section and any other
 information the commission deems necessary to conduct the assessment. A civil penalty under this subdivision shall be imposed under the procedures set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25362.

(c) Subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 25362 shall apply to a person who willfully submits or makes any false statement to the commission.

(d) The commission shall conduct a public meeting in December of each year to provide an opportunity for the public to provide input on transportation fuel prices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.2.

(a) The commission shall aggregate information used in the assessment prepared under Section 25371 to the extent necessary to ensure its confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information or data would adversely affect market competition.

(b) A person required to present information to the commission pursuant to Section 25371 may request that specific information be held in confidence. Information requested to be held in confidence shall be presumed to be confidential.

(c) For purposes of the assessment conducted under Section 25371, the commission shall comply with the disclosure of information requirements of subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, of Section
 25364.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.3.

On or before December 31, 2024, the commission and the State Air Resources Board, taking into account findings of the assessment conducted under Section 25371, shall prepare a Transportation Fuels Transition Plan. The commission and the State Air Resources Board shall determine the contents of the report, but the report shall include, at a minimum, a discussion of how to ensure that the supply of petroleum and alternative transportation fuels is affordable, reliable, equitable, and adequate to meet the demand for those transportation fuels described in the most current scoping plan approved by the State Air Resources Board under Section 38561 of the Health and Safety Code. The report shall be prepared in consultation with a multistakeholder, multiagency workgroup convened by the commission, the California Environmental Protection
 Agency, the Natural Resources Agency, and the State Air Resources Board to identify mechanisms to plan for and monitor progress toward the state’s reliable, safe, equitable, and affordable transition away from petroleum fuels in line with declining instate petroleum demand. The workgroup shall consist of members representing interests that include, but are not limited to, environmental justice, labor, environmental protection, land use, and public health, members representing the state’s fuel producers and refiners, and members representing relevant state, regional, and local agencies. The Division of Petroleum Market Oversight shall provide input to and otherwise support other divisions of the commission in preparation of the plan.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 4.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25371.4.

The commission shall, on or before March 31, 2026, submit an assessment to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor that evaluates the recommendations and strategies put forward by the vice chair of the commission in the June 27, 2025, letter to Governor Newsom in order to, as described in that letter, “ensure that Californians have access to safe, affordable, and reliable transportation fuels and that petroleum refiners continue to see value in serving the California market...” The assessment shall also offer recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor on potential changes to working group authorities or structures, including on permitting changes and reforms, which may include one-stop-shop permitting, to support the state’s reliable, equitable, safe, and affordable
 transition away from petroleum fuels.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 118, Sec. 8.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Division of Petroleum Market Oversight [25372. - 25372.4.]

25372.

For purposes of this article and Article 4 (commencing with Section 25373), “division” means the Division of Petroleum Market Oversight.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.1.

(a) The Division of Petroleum Market Oversight is hereby established in the commission.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25200), the division shall operate with authority independent of the commission’s authority.

(c) The division shall be led by a director, who is appointed by the Governor and is subject to confirmation by the Senate, and holds office at the pleasure of the Governor.

(d) The annual salary of the director shall be provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) The director shall employ and prescribe the duties of other staff members as necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. The staff shall include, when feasible, economists, individuals with expertise in the transportation fuels markets, and investigative staff with legal training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.2.

(a) The division shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide independent oversight and analysis of the transportation fuels markets for the protection of consumers by identifying market design flaws, market power abuses, and any other manner by which market participants act to harm competition or act contrary to the best interests of consumers in the state.

(2) Provide guidance and recommendations to the commission relating to the development of the assessment required by Section 25371 and the Transportation Fuels Transition Plan described in Section 25371.3.

(3) Provide guidance and recommendations to members of the commission, other divisions of the commission, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration relating to the reports described in Section 25355.7.

(4) Provide guidance and recommendations to the Governor, members of the commission, and other divisions of the commission on any other issues related to transportation fuels pricing and transportation decarbonization in California.

(5) Report its findings and recommendations to improve market performance at least annually to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the Governor, the commission, the Attorney General, and the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(b) (1) The division may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance and testimony, administer oaths and affirmations, take evidence, and require by subpoena the production of any books, papers, records, or other items material to the performance of the division’s duties or exercise of its powers, including, but not limited to, current and historical pricing and sales data and contracts with other petroleum industry participants.

(2) With respect to the division, the director of the division is the “head of a department” for purposes of, and the division may undertake investigations in the manner described in, Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The division may
 confidentially refer potential violations of law to the Attorney General at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 8.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.3.

The director of the division shall, when requested, appear before the appropriate policy committees in the Assembly and Senate to provide an update on the division’s performance as compared to its objectives, the status of competition in the transportation fuels markets, and any other information the committees request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25372.4.

(a) Information provided to the division shall presumptively be confidential and not subject to public disclosure. The division shall not divulge or make known in any manner any information provided to it unless it determines both of the following:

(1) Public disclosure of the specific information would not result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information.

(2) Public disclosure of the specific information would not adversely affect market competition.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the division may disclose information deemed confidential under this subdivision to members of
 the commission, other divisions of the commission, the Attorney General, or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration if the receiving entity agrees to keep the information confidential, except that the Attorney General may present the information to a court to support an enforcement action but shall submit confidential information under seal where permissible. If the Attorney General requests the assistance of the division in connection with any investigation, the division shall provide information to the Attorney General under this subdivision and any other assistance that is feasible.

(c) For purposes of the division’s annual reports under Section 25372.2, the division shall aggregate data or otherwise anonymize and generalize information as needed to mitigate the risk that public disclosure of the specific information would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or would adversely
 affect market competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee [25373. - 25373.]

25373.

(a) The commission and division shall be advised by the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee, which is hereby established within the commission. The committee shall consist of the following members:

(1) Six members appointed by the Governor as follows:

(A) A member who holds an academic appointment and has knowledge of economics or business operations of the transportation fuels market.

(B) A member representing the California petroleum fuels industry.

(C) A member representing
 consumers.

(D) A member representing a labor organization with experience in refinery operations.

(E) A member with expertise in community, environmental, or environmental justice issues.

(F) A member with expertise in antitrust law.

(2) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(b) (1) Except for the member described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of, or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of, subdivision (a), a member of the committee shall not have been employed by, contracted with, or received direct compensation from, a company that produces, refines, distributes, trades in, markets, or sells any petroleum product in the preceding 12 months.

(2) Except for the member described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of, or subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of, subdivision (a), before accepting appointment, members of the committee shall agree, in writing, not to be employed by, contract with, or receive direct compensation from companies described in paragraph (1) for the 12 months following the completion of their service on the committee.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to exclude a representative of a labor organization whose membership consists of, in whole or in part, individuals employed by a company that produces, refines, distributes, trades in, markets, or sells any petroleum product who otherwise meets the requirements of this section.

(c) Each member of the committee shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day actually spent in the discharge of official duties, and shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties.

(d) The duties, organization, and schedule of meetings of the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee shall be prescribed by the commission, but shall meet no less than
 annually. The commission may delegate the authority under this subdivision to the executive director of the commission.

(e) The Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee shall have access to aggregated or otherwise anonymized information submitted to the commission or to the division necessary to fulfill its duties under conditions as the commission determines necessary to ensure that any public disclosure of the specific information would not result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or adversely affect market competition. The members of the committee shall also agree, in writing, to maintain the confidentiality of all information received.

(f) The executive director of the commission shall ensure that any confidential information shared with
 the members of the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee is subject to a
 nondisclosure agreement and is maintained in a way that protects it from inadvertent disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 9.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Energy Resources Conservation [25400. - 25405.6.]

25400.

The commission shall conduct an ongoing assessment of the opportunities and constraints presented by all forms of energy. The commission shall encourage the balanced use of all sources of energy to meet the state’s needs and shall seek to avoid possible undesirable consequences of reliance on a single source of energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.

The commission shall continuously carry out studies, research projects, data collection, and other activities required to assess the nature, extent, and distribution of energy resources to meet the needs of the state, including but not limited to, fossil fuels and solar, nuclear, and geothermal energy resources. It shall also carry out studies, technical assessments, research projects, and data collection directed to reducing wasteful, inefficient, unnecessary, or uneconomic uses of energy, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Pricing of electricity and other forms of energy.

(b) Improved building design and insulation.

(c) Restriction of promotional activities designed to increase the use of electricity by consumers.

(d) Improved appliance efficiency.

(e) Advances in power generation and transmission technology.

(f) Comparisons in the efficiencies of alternative methods of energy utilization.

The commission shall survey pursuant to this section all forms of energy on which to base its recommendations to the Governor and Legislature for elimination of waste or increases in efficiency for sources or uses of energy. The commission shall transmit to the Governor and the Legislature, as part of the biennial report specified in Section 25302, recommendations for state policy and actions for the orderly development of all potential
 sources of energy to meet the state’s needs, including, but not limited to, fossil fuels and solar, nuclear, and geothermal energy resources, and to reduce wasteful and inefficient uses of energy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 256.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.2.

(a) As part of the report required by Section 25302, the commission shall develop and update an inventory of current and potential cost-effective opportunities in each utility’s service territory to improve efficiencies and to help utilities manage loads in all sectors of natural gas and electricity use. The report shall include estimates of the overall magnitude of these resources, load shapes, and the projected costs associated with delivering the various types of energy savings that are identified in the inventory. The report shall also estimate the amount and incremental cost per unit of potential energy efficiency and load management activities. Where applicable, the inventory shall include data on
 variations in savings and costs associated with particular measures. The report shall take into consideration environmental benefits as developed in related commission and Public Utilities Commission proceedings.

(b) The commission shall develop and maintain the inventory in consultation with electric and gas utilities, the Public Utilities Commission, academic institutions, and other interested parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 611, Sec. 8.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.5.

For the purpose of reducing electrical and natural gas energy consumption, the commission may develop and disseminate measures that would enhance energy efficiency for single-family residential dwellings that were built prior to the development of the current energy efficiency standards. The measures, if developed and disseminated, shall provide a homeowner with information to improve the energy efficiency of a single-family residential dwelling. The commission may comply with this section by posting the measures on the commission’s Internet Web site or by making the measures available to the public, upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 773, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.7.

At the time a single-family residential dwelling is sold, a buyer or seller may request a home inspection, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 7195 of the Business and Professions Code, and a home inspector, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 7195 of the Business and Professions Code, shall provide, contact information for one or more of the following entities that provide home energy information:

(a) A nonprofit organization.

(b) A provider to the residential dwelling of electrical service, or gas service, or both.

(c) A government agency, including, but not limited to, the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 773, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.9.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25402, to the extent that funds are available, the commission, in consultation with the Department of Water Resources and in consideration of developments in landscape irrigation efficiency occurring on or after January 1, 2010, shall adopt by regulation,
 performance standards and labeling requirements for landscape irrigation equipment, including, but not limited to, irrigation controllers, moisture sensors, emission devices, and valves.

(b) For the purposes of complying with subdivision (a), the commission shall do both of the following:

(1) Adopt performance standards and labeling requirements for landscape irrigation
 equipment on or before January 1, 2019.

(2) Consider the Irrigation Association’s Smart Water Application Technology Program testing protocols when adopting performance standards for landscape irrigation equipment, including, but not limited to, irrigation controllers, moisture sensors, emission devices, and valves.

(c) No new irrigation
 equipment for landscape irrigation uses that is manufactured on or after the effective date of the regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be sold or offered for sale in the state unless the irrigation equipment meets the performance standards and labeling requirements established pursuant to this
 section and is certified by the manufacturer as in compliance with those standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 326, Sec. 1.   (AB 1928)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.

The commission shall, after one or more public hearings, do all of the following to reduce the wasteful, uneconomic, inefficient, or unnecessary consumption of energy, including the energy associated with the use of water, and to manage energy loads to help maintain electrical grid reliability:

(a) (1) Prescribe, by regulation, lighting, insulation, climate control system, and other building design and construction standards that increase efficiency in the use of energy and water for new residential and new nonresidential buildings. The commission shall periodically update the standards and adopt any revision that, in its judgment, it deems necessary. Six months after the commission certifies an energy conservation manual pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 25402.1, a city, county, city and county, or state agency shall not issue a permit for a building unless the building satisfies the standards prescribed by the commission pursuant to this subdivision or subdivision (b) that are in effect on the date an application for a building permit is filed. Water efficiency standards adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be demonstrated by the commission to be necessary to save energy.

(2) Before adopting a water efficiency standard for residential buildings, the Department of Housing and Community Development and the commission shall issue a joint finding whether the standard (A) is equivalent or superior in performance, in safety, and for the protection of life, health, and general welfare to standards in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations and (B) does not unreasonably or unnecessarily impact the ability of Californians to purchase or rent affordable housing, as determined by taking
 account of the overall benefit derived from water efficiency standards. This subdivision does not in any way reduce the authority of the Department of Housing and Community Development to adopt standards and regulations pursuant to the State Housing Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 17910) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code).

(3) Water efficiency standards and water conservation design standards adopted pursuant to this subdivision and subdivision (b) shall be consistent with the legislative findings of this division to ensure and maintain a reliable supply of electrical energy and be equivalent to or superior to the performance, safety, and protection of life, health, and general welfare standards contained in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations. The commission shall consult with the members of the coordinating council as established in Section 18926 of the Health and Safety Code in the development of these
 standards.

(b) (1) Prescribe, by regulation, energy and water conservation design standards for new residential and new nonresidential buildings. The standards shall be performance standards and shall be promulgated in terms of energy consumption per gross square foot of floorspace, but may also include devices, systems, and techniques required to conserve energy and water. The commission shall periodically review the standards and adopt any revision that, in its judgment, it deems necessary. A building that satisfies the standards prescribed pursuant to this subdivision need not comply with the standards prescribed pursuant to subdivision (a). Water conservation design standards adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be demonstrated by the commission to be necessary to save energy. Before adopting a water conservation design standard for residential buildings, the Department of Housing and Community Development and
 the commission shall issue a joint finding whether the standard (A) is equivalent or superior in performance, in safety, and for the protection of life, health, and general welfare to standards in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, and (B) does not unreasonably or unnecessarily impact the ability of Californians to purchase or rent affordable housing, as determined by taking account of the overall benefit derived from the water conservation design standards. This subdivision does not in any way reduce the authority of the Department of Housing and Community Development to adopt standards and regulations pursuant to the State Housing Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 17910) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) To increase public participation and improve the efficacy of the standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) and this subdivision, the commission shall, before publication of the notice of proposed action
 required by Section 18935 of the Health and Safety Code, involve parties who would be subject to the proposed regulations in public meetings regarding the proposed regulations. All potential affected parties shall be provided advance notice of these meetings and given an opportunity to provide written or oral comments. During these public meetings, the commission shall receive and take into consideration input from all parties concerning the parties’ design recommendations, cost considerations, and other factors that would affect consumers and California businesses of the proposed standard. The commission shall take into consideration before the start of the notice of proposed action any input provided during these public meetings.

(3) The standards adopted or revised pursuant to subdivision (a) and this subdivision shall be cost effective when taken in their entirety and when amortized over the economic life of the structure compared with
 historic practice. When determining cost-effectiveness, the commission shall consider the value of the water or energy saved, the impact on product efficacy for the consumer, and the life-cycle cost of complying with the standard. The commission shall consider other relevant factors, as required by Sections 18930 and 18935 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the impact on housing costs, the total statewide costs and benefits of the standard over its lifetime, the economic impact on California businesses, and any alternative approaches and their associated costs.

(c) (1) (A) (i) Prescribe, by regulation, standards for minimum levels of operating efficiency, based on a reasonable use pattern, and may prescribe other cost-effective measures, including incentive programs, fleet averaging, energy and water consumption labeling not preempted by federal
 labeling law, and consumer education programs, to promote the use of energy- and water-efficient appliances whose use, as determined by the commission, requires a significant amount of energy or water on a statewide basis. The minimum levels of operating efficiency shall be based on feasible and attainable efficiencies or feasible improved efficiencies that will reduce the energy or water consumption growth rates. The standards for minimum levels of operating efficiency shall become effective no sooner than one year after the date of adoption or revision, unless the commission adopts a finding of good cause in which case the standards may become effective sooner than one year after the date of adoption or revision. A new appliance manufactured on or after the effective date of the standards or other cost-effective measures shall not be sold or offered for sale in the state, unless it is certified by the manufacturer of the appliance to be in compliance with the standards or other cost-effective measures. The
 standards or other cost-effective measures shall be drawn so that they do not result in any added total costs for consumers over the designed life of the appliances concerned. “Sold or offered for sale in the state” means any sale of or offer to sell an appliance for end use in the state, regardless of the seller’s physical location, and includes, without limitation, internet, telephone, and mail order transactions. For purposes of this section, the Uniform Commercial Code–Sales (Division 2 (commencing with Section 2101) of the Commercial Code) does not define “sold or offered for sale” or determine where sales or offers for sale occur.

(ii) In making a finding of good cause for purposes of a standard becoming effective sooner than one year after the date of adoption or revision pursuant to clause (i), the commission shall consider, among other things, the following factors:

(I) The availability of products on the market that meet the proposed standard.

(II) The impact of an earlier effective date on manufacturers.

(III) The health and safety benefits of an earlier effective date.

(IV) The impact on innovation resulting from a one-year delay between the date of adoption or revision and the effective date of the standard.

(V) The concerns raised by comments, provided to the commission pursuant to subparagraph (B), for an earlier effective date.

(B) To increase public participation and improve the efficacy of the standards adopted pursuant to this subdivision, the commission shall, before publication of the notice of proposed action required by
 Section 18935 of the Health and Safety Code, involve parties who would be subject to the proposed regulations in public meetings regarding the proposed regulations. All potential affected parties shall be provided advance notice of these meetings and given an opportunity to provide written or oral comments. During these public meetings, the commission shall receive and take into consideration input from all parties concerning the parties’ design recommendations, cost considerations, and other factors that would affect consumers and California businesses of the proposed standard. The commission shall take into consideration before the start of the notice of proposed action any input provided during these public meetings.

(C) The standards adopted or revised pursuant to this subdivision shall not result in any added total costs for consumers over the designed life of the appliances concerned. When determining cost-effectiveness, the commission
 shall consider the value of the water or energy saved, the impact on product efficacy for the consumer, and the life-cycle cost to the consumer of complying with the standard. The commission shall consider other relevant factors, as required by Sections 11346.5 and 11357 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, the impact on housing costs, the total statewide costs and benefits of the standard over its lifetime, the economic impact on California businesses, and any alternative approaches and their associated costs.

(2) A new appliance, except for a plumbing fitting, regulated under paragraph (1), that is manufactured on or after July 1, 1984, shall not be sold, or offered for sale, in the state, unless the date of the manufacture is permanently displayed in an accessible place on that appliance.

(3) During the period of five years after the commission has adopted a
 standard for a particular appliance under paragraph (1), an increase or decrease in the minimum level of operating efficiency required by the standard for that appliance shall not become effective, unless the commission adopts other cost-effective measures for that appliance.

(4) Neither the commission nor any other state agency shall take any action to decrease any standard adopted under this subdivision on or before June 30, 1985, prescribing minimum levels of operating efficiency or other energy conservation measures for any appliance, unless the commission finds by a four-fifths vote that a decrease is of benefit to ratepayers, and that there is significant evidence of changed circumstances. At least one year before the adoption or amendment of a standard for an appliance, the commission shall notify the Legislature of its intent, and the justification to adopt or amend a standard for the appliance. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) and this
 paragraph, the commission may do any of the following:

(A) Increase the minimum level of operating efficiency in an existing standard up to the level of the National Voluntary Consensus Standards 90, adopted by the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers or, for appliances not covered by that standard, up to the level established in a similar nationwide consensus standard.

(B) Change the measure or rating of efficiency of any standard, if the minimum level of operating efficiency remains substantially the same.

(C) Adjust the minimum level of operating efficiency in an existing standard to reflect changes in test procedures that the standards require manufacturers to use in certifying compliance, if the minimum level of operating efficiency remains substantially the same.

(D) Readopt a standard preempted, enjoined, or otherwise found legally defective by an administrative agency or a lower court, if final legal action determines that the standard is valid and if the standard that is readopted is not more stringent than the standard that was found to be defective or preempted.

(E) Adopt or amend any existing or new standard at any level of operating efficiency, if the Governor has declared an energy emergency as described in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(d) Recommend minimum standards of efficiency for the operation of a new facility at a particular site that are technically and economically feasible. A site and related facility shall not be certified pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 25500), unless the applicant certifies that standards recommended by the commission
 have been considered, which certification shall include a statement specifying the extent to which conformance with the recommended standards will be achieved.

(e) (1) Adopt, by regulation, and periodically update, standards for appliances to facilitate the deployment of flexible demand technologies. These regulations may include labeling provisions to promote the use of appliances with flexible demand capabilities. The flexible demand appliance standards shall be based on feasible and attainable efficiencies or feasible improvements that will enable appliance operations to be scheduled, shifted, or curtailed to enhance grid reliability, reduce emissions of greenhouse gases associated with electricity generation, or both enhancement and reduction. The standards shall become effective no sooner than one year after the date of their adoption or updating.

(2) In
 adopting the flexible demand appliance standards, the commission shall consider the National Institute of Standards and Technology’s reliability and cybersecurity protocols, or other cybersecurity protocols that are equally or more protective, and shall adopt, at a minimum, the North American Electric Reliability Corporation’s Critical Infrastructure Protection standards.

(3) The flexible demand appliance standards shall be cost effective. When determining cost-effectiveness, solely for purposes of this subdivision, the commission may consider, as appropriate, the cost of flexible demand appliances compared to nonflexible demand appliances, the value of increased or decreased emissions of greenhouse gases associated with the timing of an appliance’s use, the life-cycle cost to the consumer from using a product that complies with the standard, and the life-cycle costs and benefits to consumers, including the ability to conserve energy and better
 align consumer and electric system demand. The commission shall consider other relevant factors, as required by Sections 11346.5 and 11357 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, the impact on housing costs, the total statewide costs and benefits of the standard over its lifetime, the economic impact on California businesses, and alternative approaches and their associated costs.

(4) The commission shall consult with the Public Utilities Commission, load-serving entities, and local publicly owned electric utilities to better align the flexible demand appliance standards with demand response programs administered by the state and load-serving entities and local publicly owned electric utilities and to incentivize the deployment of flexible demand appliances.

(5) The flexible demand appliance standards shall prioritize all of the following:

(A) Appliances that can more conveniently have their electrical demand controlled by load-management technology and third-party load-management programs.

(B) Appliances with load-management technology options that are readily available.

(C) Appliances that have a user-friendly interface and follow a straightforward setup and connection process, such as remote setup by means of an internet website or application.

(D) Appliances with load-management technology options that follow simple standards for third-party direct operation of the appliances.

(E) Appliances that are interoperable or open source.

(6) On or before January 1,
 2021, and as necessary thereafter, the commission shall include as part of each integrated energy policy report adopted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 25300) a description of any actions it has taken pursuant to this subdivision and the flexible demand appliance standards’ cost to consumers.

(7) For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following definitions apply:
